Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 251.170, as amended by section 3,  chapter 55, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
1, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
251.170. (1) The translation of a  state voters’ pamphlet or county voters’ pamphlet required un-
der ORS 251.167 shall be made in the manner described in this section.
(2) For each state voters’ pamphlet and county voters’ pamphlet mailed to residents of a  county,
the Secretary of State shall have the following portions  of the voters’ pamphlet professionally
translated into each language for which a translation is required under ORS 251.167:
(a) Any official statement  or communication made by the Secretary of State, county clerk, filing
office or other  public elections official, including any information described in ORS 251.026 or
251.315 (1)(a) to (d) and (g) and any other information regarding services offered  by elections offices,
how to cast a ballot and key dates for the election;
(b) The ballot title for each measure;
(c) The explanatory statement for each measure;
(d) The financial estimate for each measure and any  statement prepared for a measure under
ORS 250.125;
(e) Any racial and ethnic impact statement prepared for a measure under ORS 137.685;
(f) Any statement submitted for a measure by a citizen panel under ORS 250.141; and
(g) Except an argument for a measure prepared by the Legislative Assembly under ORS 251.245,
any other statement for a measure created by a public body as defined in ORS 174.109.
(3) In addition to the materials that the Secretary of  State is required to have professionally
translated under subsection  (2) of this section, the Secretary of State shall allow to be included in
the translated version of each state voters’ pamphlet that is  made available on the website of the
Secretary of State or of a county under ORS 251.167:
(a) Translations of a candidate statement submitted under ORS 251.065, provided that:
(A) The candidate is a candidate for federal or statewide office;
(B) The translation is filed by a  candidate or the agent of a candidate described in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph;
(C) Neither the translation nor the candidate statement submitted  under ORS 251.065 is rejected
under ORS 251.055;
(D) The candidate statement meets the requirements of a candidate statement set forth  in this
chapter; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1014 (SB 1014-INTRO) Page 1
(E) Any translation filed under this paragraph is in one of the 10 most  commonly spoken lan-
guages in this state  or of any county the office represents, other than English, as listed by the
Secretary of State under ORS 251.167.
(b) Translations of an argument in support  of or in opposition to a state measure filed under
ORS 251.255, provided that:
(A) The translation is filed by the person who filed the argument in support of or in opposition
to a state measure under ORS 251.255;
(B) Neither the translation nor  the argument in support of or in opposition to a state measure
filed under ORS 251.255 is rejected under ORS 251.055;
(C) The  statement in support of or in opposition to a state measure meets the requirements of
a statement in support of or in opposition to a state measure set forth in this chapter; and
(D) Any translation filed under this  paragraph is in one of the 10 most commonly spoken lan-
guages in  this state or of any county in which the measure will be voted on, other than English,
as listed by the Secretary of State under ORS 251.167.
(c) Translations of a statement of  arguments by a party filed under ORS 251.115, provided
that:
(A) The translation is  filed by the person who filed the statement of arguments under
ORS 251.115;
(B) Neither the translation nor the statement of arguments filed  under ORS 251.115 is
rejected under ORS 251.055;
(C) The statement of arguments meets the requirements of a statement of arguments
set forth in this chapter; and
(D) Any translation filed under this paragraph is in  one of the five most commonly spo-
ken languages in this state, other than English, as listed by the Secretary of State under
ORS 251.167.
[(c)] (d) Translations of any argument  for a measure prepared by the Legislative Assembly under
ORS 251.245 submitted by the Legislative Assembly, provided that  any translation filed under this
paragraph is in one of the 10 most commonly spoken languages in  this state or of any county in
which the measure will be voted on,  other than English, as listed by the Secretary of State under
ORS 251.167.
(4)(a) A translation that is permitted or required under this section is not required to be iden-
tical in words to the original version but must be consistent with the meaning of the original ver-
sion.
(b) A translation is  not subject to any limitations on the number of words allowed set forth in
this chapter.
(5) A county  may at its own expense make or accept for publication on the county’s website,
as part of a translated voters’  pamphlet required under ORS 251.167, any portion of a state or
county voters’ pamphlet that is not described in this section.
(6) The Secretary of State:
(a) May adopt any rules necessary to implement this section; and
(b) Except  as provided in subsection (5) of this section, is responsible for all costs necessary to
comply with this section.
(7) As used in this section, “statewide office” means  Governor, Secretary of State, State Treas-
urer, Attorney General,  Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, or judge on the
Oregon Supreme Court, the Oregon Court of Appeals or the Oregon Tax Court.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 251.170 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to state
voters’ pamphlets and county voters’ pamphlets that are distributed on or after January 31,
2026.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1014 (SB 1014-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 28, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1014 (SB 1014-INTRO) Page 3